Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-855
Act; supplemental to other laws.

The
Nebraska Educational, Health,
and Social Services Finance Authority Act shall be deemed to provide
a complete, additional, and alternative method for doing the things authorized
in the act and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers
conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under the
act need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the
issuance of bonds, and the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, and renovation of a project pursuant to the act
by the authority need not comply with the requirements of any competitive
bidding law or other restriction imposed on the procedure for award of contracts
for the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, and renovation of a project
or the lease, sale, or disposition of property of the authority, except that
if the prospective lessee so requests in writing, the authority shall call
for construction bids in such manner as shall be determined by the authority
with the approval of such lessee. Except as otherwise expressly provided in
the act, none of the powers granted to the authority under the act shall be
subject to the supervision of or regulation by or require the approval or
consent of any municipality, political subdivision, commission, board, body,
bureau, official, or agency or the state.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 52;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2952;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 52;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1752;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 55.